Illinois, session 104th, SB2064.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Youth 5Social Media Engagement Act. 6    Section 5. Findings and intent. The General Assembly finds 7and declares: 8    (a) On May 23, 2023, U.S. Surgeon General Dr. Vivek Murthy 9released a Social Media and Youth Mental Health advisory to 10recognize the growing impact of social media on youth mental 11health and well-being as a significant public health challenge 12that requires immediate awareness and action. 13    (b) The advisory includes recommendations for policymakers 14to address this issue, including to "strengthen protections to 15ensure greater safety for children interacting with all social 16media platforms". 17    (c) In the United States, up to 95% of youth ages 13 to 17 18report using social media platforms, and a third of youth 19report using social media "almost constantly". 20    (d) A study of youth in the United States ages 12 to 15 21found that youth who spend 3 or more hours a day on social 22media had double the risk of experiencing poor mental health 23outcomes, including experiencing symptoms of depression and   SB2064- 2 -LRB104 09138 SPS 19194 b1anxiety. As of 2021, the average time spent on social media for 2this age group is 3.5 hours a day, with one in 4 youth spending 35 or more hours a day on the platforms, and one in 5 youth 4spending 7 or more hours a day on social media. 5    (e) A systematic review of 42 studies on the effects of 6excessive social media use found a consistent relationship 7between social media use and poor sleep quality, reduced sleep 8duration, sleep difficulties, and depression among youth. 9    (f) Social media sites are designed to maximize user 10engagement, which can encourage excessive social media use and 11behavioral dysregulation. Youth undergo critical periods of 12brain development, and social media exposure and frequent use 13may be associated with distinct changes in the developing 14brain, including overstimulation of the amygdala, triggering 15pathways similar to those in individuals with substance use or 16gambling addictions. 17    (g) The Illinois Children's Mental Health Partnership 18developed goals in 2022. One of the goals was to "increase 19public awareness on all issues connected to child mental 20health and wellness to decrease stigma and promote acceptance, 21and strengthen children, families, and communities to identify 22needs and access support with resources and funding". 23    (h) Understanding more about how technology and health 24intersect can help solve certain societal problems and improve 25the mental and physical health of Illinois youth. 26    (i) It is a matter of statewide concern to provide   SB2064- 3 -LRB104 09138 SPS 19194 b1research-based education and interventions, including 2resources on the effects of social media use on brain 3development, how to mitigate the risks associated with social 4media use, and how to maintain well-being while interacting in 5online environments, to help youth make informed decisions on 6responsible social media use. 7    Section 10. Commission on Youth Social Media Engagement. 8    (a) The Commission on Youth Social Media Engagement is 9created. The Commission shall develop a resource bank of 10existing evidence-based and research-based scholarly articles 11pertaining to the mental and physical health impacts of social 12media use by youth, Internet safety, and cybersecurity and 13make recommendations to the General Assembly concerning 14practical avenues to inform local community organizations, 15parents, youth, and the general public about the resource bank 16in a manner that allows for the collection of disaggregated 17data on how often the materials are accessed. 18    (b) The Commission shall consist of the following members: 19        (1) the Director of the Department of Public Health or 20    the Director's designee, who shall serve as Chair of the 21    Commission; 22        (2) the Director of the Department of Healthcare and 23    Family Services or the Director's designee; 24        (3) the State Superintendent of Education or the State 25    Superintendent's designee;   SB2064- 4 -LRB104 09138 SPS 19194 b1        (4) 4 members appointed by the Governor, of which 3 2    members shall represent the interests of social media 3    platforms; 4        (5) 5 members appointed by the President of the 5    Senate, of which one member shall represent the interests 6    of parents, one member shall be between the ages of 16 and 7    25 years of age, one member with experience as a youth 8    mental health professional such as a social worker, child 9    adolescent psychiatrist, or other professional 10    specializing in youth mental health, and not more than one 11    of whom may be a current member of the General Assembly; 12        (6) 5 members appointed by the Speaker of the House of 13    Representatives, of which one member shall represent the 14    interests of parents, one youth member shall be between 15    the ages of 16 and 25 years of age, one member shall have 16    experience as a youth mental health professional such as a 17    social worker, child adolescent psychiatrist, or other 18    professional specializing in youth mental health, and not 19    more than one of whom shall be a current member of the 20    General Assembly; 21        (7) 5 members appointed by the Minority Leader of the 22    Senate, of which one member shall represent the interests 23    of parents, one youth member shall be between the ages of 24    16 and 25 years of age, one member shall have experience as 25    a youth mental health professional such as a social 26    worker, child adolescent psychiatrist, or other   SB2064- 5 -LRB104 09138 SPS 19194 b1    professional specializing in youth mental health, and not 2    more than one of whom shall be a current member of the 3    General Assembly; and 4        (8) 5 members appointed by the Minority Leader of the 5    House of Representatives, of which one member shall 6    represent the interests of parents, one youth member shall 7    be between the ages of 16 and 25 years of age, one member 8    shall have experience as a youth mental health 9    professional such as a social worker, child adolescent 10    psychiatrist, or other professional specializing in youth 11    mental health, and not more than one of whom shall be a 12    current member of the General Assembly. 13    (c) The Commission shall have the following duties: 14        (1) establish and adopt goals and guiding principles 15    for conducting a review of relevant research to compile a 16    resource bank that will be used to inform youth, parents, 17    and the greater community of the mental health risks 18    associated with youth social media use; 19        (2) develop a review and selection process for the 20    resource bank materials; 21        (3) identify the scholarly articles and materials that 22    will be a part of the resource bank by following the 23    process outlined by the Commission; 24        (4) ensure, to the extent possible, the resource bank 25    materials are youth-friendly, culturally sensitive, and 26    available in both English and Spanish, and may include   SB2064- 6 -LRB104 09138 SPS 19194 b1    Internet links to scholarly articles, resources, and 2    materials about the mental and physical health impacts of 3    social media use, Internet safety, and cybersecurity from 4    entities that the Commission finds reliable; 5        (5) when possible, as part of the resource bank, 6    identify what grade or age-group materials are appropriate 7    for; 8        (6) engage with relevant community stakeholders, 9    including youth, for input on what type of information 10    should be included within the resource bank; and 11        (7) consider what avenues of distribution for the 12    resource bank will inform local community organizations, 13    parents, youth, and the general public about the resource 14    bank in a manner that allows for the collection of 15    disaggregated data on how often the materials are 16    accessed. 17    (d) The appointing authorities shall make appointments to 18the Commission as soon as practicable after the effective date 19of this Act, and the Chair of the Commission shall convene the 20first meeting by September 15, 2025. Subsequent meetings of 21the Commission shall convene at the call of the Chair of the 22Commission. A majority of all the appointed members of the 23Commission shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of 24business and all recommendations of the Commission shall 25require approval of a majority of the members of the 26Commission. Meetings of the Commission are subject to the Open   SB2064- 7 -LRB104 09138 SPS 19194 b1Meetings Act. 2    (e) Members of the Commission shall serve without 3compensation. 4    (f) The Department of Public Health shall provide 5administrative support to the Commission. 6    (g) On or before December 31, 2025, the Commission shall 7submit to the General Assembly a written report that: 8        (1) describes the process selected by the Commission 9    to create the resource bank; 10        (2) compiles the resource bank materials selected 11    through the Commission's selected process; and 12        (3) makes recommendations to the General Assembly 13    regarding practical avenues to inform local community 14    organizations, parents, youth, and the general public 15    about the resource bank in a manner that allows for the 16    collection of disaggregated data on how often the 17    materials are accessed. 18    (h) This Section is repealed on January 1, 2027. 19    Section 15. Social media platform health requirements for 20youth. 21    (a) As used in this Section, "social media platform" means 22an Internet-based service, website, or application that: 23        (1) has more than 100,000 active users in Illinois; 24        (2) permits an Illinois resident to become a 25    registered user, establish an account, or create a public   SB2064- 8 -LRB104 09138 SPS 19194 b1    or semi-public profile for the purpose of allowing users 2    to create, share, and view user-generated content through 3    the account or profile; 4        (3) enables one or more users to create or post 5    content that can be viewed by other users of the medium; 6    and 7        (4) includes a substantial function to allow users to 8    interact socially with each other within the service or 9    application.10    For the purpose of this definition, a service or 11application that provides electronic mail or direct messaging 12services does not satisfy the criteria of paragraph (4) on the 13basis of that function alone. 14    "Social media platform" does not include an Internet-based 15service or application in which the predominant or exclusive 16function is: 17        (1) providing electronic mail; 18        (2) facilitating commercial transactions, if the 19    interaction with other users or account holders is 20    generally limited to: 21            (A) the ability to upload a post and comment on 22        reviews or the ability to display lists or collections 23        of goods for sale or wish lists; and 24            (B) the primary function of the platform is 25        focused on online shopping or e-commerce rather than 26        interactions between users or account holders;   SB2064- 9 -LRB104 09138 SPS 19194 b1        (3) facilitating teleconferencing and video 2    conferencing features that are limited to certain 3    participants in the teleconference or video conference and 4    are not posted publicly or for broad distribution to other 5    users; 6        (4) facilitating crowd-sourced content for reference 7    guides such as encyclopedias and dictionaries; 8        (5) providing cloud-based electronic services, 9    including cloud-based services that allow collaborative 10    editing by invited users; 11        (6) consisting primarily of news, sports, 12    entertainment, or other content that is preselected by the 13    provider and not user generated, and any chat, comment, or 14    interactive functionality that is provided incidental to, 15    directly related to, or dependent upon provision of the 16    content; or 17        (7) interactive gaming, virtual gaming, or an online 18    service that allows the creation and uploading of content 19    for the purpose of interactive or virtual gaming; 20        (8) providing information concerning businesses, 21    products, or travel information, including user reviews or 22    rankings of businesses or products; 23        (9) facilitating communication within a business or an 24    enterprise among employees or affiliates of the business 25    or enterprise so long as access to the service or 26    application is restricted to employees or affiliates of   SB2064- 10 -LRB104 09138 SPS 19194 b1    the business or enterprise; 2        (10) selling enterprise software to businesses, 3    governments, or nonprofit organizations; 4        (11) providing a streaming service that streams only 5    licensed media in a continuous flow from the service, 6    website, or application to the end user and does not 7    require a user or account holder to obtain a license for 8    the media by agreement with a social media platform's 9    terms of service; 10        (12) providing an online service, website, or 11    application that is used by or under the direction of an 12    educational entity, including a learning management 13    system, a student engagement program, or a subject- or 14    skill-specific program, for which the majority of the 15    content is created or posted by the provider of the online 16    service, website, or application and the ability to chat, 17    comment, or interact with other users is directly related 18    to the provider's content; 19        (13) providing or obtaining technical support for a 20    platform, product, or service; 21        (14) providing career development opportunities, 22    including professional networking, job skills, learning 23    certifications, and job posting and application services; 24        (15) focused on facilitating academic or scholarly 25    research; or 26        (16) reporting or disseminating news information, as   SB2064- 11 -LRB104 09138 SPS 19194 b1    protected by the United States Constitution. 2    (b) On and after January 1, 2027, a social media platform 3operating in this State shall establish a function that 4either: 5        (1) meets the criteria described in subsection (c) and 6    is informed by the standards established under subsection 7    (d); or 8        (2) displays a pop-up or full screen notification to a 9    user who attests to being under the age of 18:10            (A) when the user has spent one cumulative hour on 11        the social media platform during a 24-hour period; or12            (B) when the user is on a social media platform 13        between the hours of 10 p.m. and 6 a.m.14        The notification described in this paragraph shall 15    repeat at least once every 30 minutes after the initial 16    notification.17    (c) A social media platform that establishes the function 18described in paragraph (1) of subsection (b) shall provide 19users who are under the age of 18 with information about youth 20engagement with social media that helps the user understand 21the impact of social media on the developing brain and the 22mental and physical health of youth users. The information 23shall be supported by data from peer-reviewed scholarly 24articles or the sources included in the resource bank 25developed by the Commission on Youth Social Media Engagement. 26    (d) The Department of Public Health, in consultation with   SB2064- 12 -LRB104 09138 SPS 19194 b1the Department of Innovation and Technology, shall establish 2standards for the functions established by social media 3platforms under subsection (b). The standards shall: 4        (1) recommend intervals for notification frequency 5    that are similar to those in paragraph (2) of subsection 6    (b); 7        (2) provide sample messaging for the content of the 8    notification; 9        (3) be informed by data and research on the efficacy 10    of notifications; 11        (4) be ix nformed by the resource bank developed by 12    the Commission on Youth Social Media Engagement; and 13        (5) recommend the age range of users who would most 14    benefit from notifications. 15    Section 20. Enforcement. A violation of Section 15 is an 16unlawful practice under the Consumer Fraud and Deceptive 17Business Practices Act. All remedies, penalties, and authority 18granted to the Attorney General by that Act shall be available 19to him or her for the enforcement of Section 15. 20    Section 25. Rulemaking. 21    (a) The Department of Public Health may adopt necessary 22rules to administer and enforce this Act. 23    (b) The Department of Public Health shall consult with the 24Department of Innovation and Technology before adopting any   SB2064- 13 -LRB104 09138 SPS 19194 b1rules that relate to the standards established under 2subsection (f) of Section 15. 3    Section 30. Severability. If any provision of this Act or 4its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, 5the invalidity of that provision or application does not 6affect other provisions or applications of this Act that can 7be given effect without the invalid provision or application. 8    Section 90. The Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business 9Practices Act is amended by adding Section 2HHHH as follows: 10    (815 ILCS 505/2HHHH new)11    Sec. 2HHHH. Violations of the Youth Social Media 12Engagement Act. A person who violates Section 15 of the Youth 13Social Media Engagement Act commits an unlawful practice 14within the meaning of this Act. 15    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 16becoming law.